



Rugged Michael Stoppelman




















Rugged Michael Stoppelman
8.01K



bschiff
12/20/06 03:31PM

Filed to: michael stoppelman

michael stoppelman
Abs
Google
jeremy stoppelman
yelp
Valleywag






This image was lost some time after publication.Michael Stoppelman, brother of Yelp CEO Jeremy Stoppelman, is in no danger of being called a manly-man. The Google coder and occasional male model is apparently competing for the wussy title of BlissGuy, in a contest held by swanky Bliss Spa. (The winner becomes the "face" of Bliss' soon-to-be released men's line, a year's worth of products and facials, and a meeting with a model scout.)Contestant Michael Stoppelman no doubt caught the judges' eye. Not only does the personable brunet have brawny good looks, he has brains, to boot: The 25-year-old is an engineer at Google. Asked about his chances of victory, Stoppelman said, "We'll see. It really depends on what they want the BlissGuy to embody. I told them that I straddle the fence between 'pretty' and 'rugged guy.' "He's right. Lots of rugged dudes get regular facials and enjoy Bliss spa treatments.THE NON-WITTY NEED NOT APPLY
Velvety-skinned guys seek Bliss in spa contest [San Francisco Chronicle]




















Michael  Stoppelman - San Francisco, CA | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Michael  Stoppelman in San Francisco, CA


Michael  Stoppelman

                                                Intelius found that Michael  Stoppelman  is  a male from San Francisco, CA.  We have connected them to
                2 addresses,
                0 phones,
                and 0 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Michael Has Lived In

San Francisco, CA
West Lafayette, IN







Michael  Stoppelman



GenderMale



Professional Status
Senior Vice President, Engineering at Yelp Inc



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Michael? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Michael, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Michael  Stoppelman
Get a Criminal Check on Michael  Stoppelman
Get a Public Record Report on Michael  Stoppelman
Get a People Search Report on Michael  Stoppelman


Michael  Stoppelman's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Michael  Stoppelman has lived as well as Michael  Stoppelman's phone numbers and email addresses.




Michael  Stoppelman Has Lived in 2 States
California Address for Michael  Stoppelman


140 N** M********* S* 

San Francisco, CA


Has Lived In

San Francisco, CA
West Lafayette, IN


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Michael  Stoppelman



Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Michael  Stoppelman

s**p@***.com


Get Email Report




Michael  Stoppelman's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Michael  Stoppelman's academic history.  Find out which schools Michael  Stoppelman attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Michael  Stoppelman received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Michael  Stoppelman Has Attended 1 School
Purdue University Michael  Stoppelman has a B.S. in Computer Science               


Michael  Stoppelman's Professional Information
Information regarding Michael  Stoppelman's professional history.  Find out previous places Michael  Stoppelman has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Michael  Stoppelman Has Worked at 1 Place
Company: Yelp Inc
               Title: Senior Vice President, Engineering
Michael  Stoppelman's Experience
Title: Senior Vice President, Engineering
               Company: Yelp Inc
Job Details
               Yelp Inc. (http://www.yelp.com) connects people with great local businesses. Yelp was founded in San Francisco in July 2004. Since then, Yelp has expanded to more than 30 countries. Approximately 25 million unique devices1 accessed Yelp via the Yelp app, approximately 77 million unique visitors visited Yelp via desktop computer2 and approximately 72 million unique visitors visited Yelp via mobile website3 on a monthly average basis during the third quarter of 2016. By the end of the same quarter, Yelpers had written approximately 115 million rich, local reviews, making Yelp the leading local guide for real word-of-mouth on everything from boutiques and mechanics to restaurants and dentists.
Additional Professional Information on Michael  Stoppelman

 See Michael  Stoppelman's LinkedIn Profile



Michael  Stoppelman's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Michael  Stoppelman


Michael  Stoppelman's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Michael  Stoppelman's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Michael Stoppelman
Username Matches

                  MichaelStoppelman
                  StoppelmanMichael
                  Michael.Stoppelman
                  Stoppelman.Michael
                  Michael_Stoppelman
                  Stoppelman_Michael
                  Michael-Stoppelman
                  Stoppelman-Michael
                  MStoppelman
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
M Stoppelman







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.






























Michael Stoppelman






































































Michael Stoppelman































































































No posts.



No posts.






Home




Subscribe to:
Posts (Atom)
















My links


Roshni's Blog
Michael Stoppelman's FriendFeed
Jeremy Stoppelman's Personal Blog












About Me





Mike Stoppelman


I'm a software engineer at Yelp, we're looking for talented engineers that are passionate about building awesome products.

View my complete profile
















Weekly Reading


Sean Plaice's blog, he's so cool!
My Yelp! Reviews
Mom's Blog
Richard Boardman's Blog
Wei-Hwa's blog















Search My Blog




















blog bling


Recent reviews by Michael S.

What's this?













































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Michael Stoppelman - Patent Inventor























Michael Stoppelman patentsRecent patents with Michael Stoppelman listed as an inventor - additional entries may be under other spellings.


















Michael Stoppelman - Related organizations: Google Inc. patents









Item recommendations
		      06/19/14 - 20140172624 - A system gathers user behavior data from a group of web retailers and/or non-web retailers, analyzes the user behavior data to identify product recommendations for products offered by the web retailers, and provides one of the identified product recommendations in connection with a product page associated with one of the
					Inventors: Michael Stoppelman 
		    












Item recommendations
		      04/25/13 - 20130103536 - A system gathers user behavior data from a group of web retailers and/or non-web retailers, analyzes the user behavior data to identify product recommendations for products offered by the web retailers, and provides one of the identified product recommendations in connection with a product page associated with one of the
					Inventors: Michael Stoppelman 
		    












Product recommendations based on collaborative filtering of seller products
		      09/29/11 - 20110238523 - A system gathers user behavior data from a group of web retailers and/or non-web retailers, analyzes the user behavior data to identify product recommendations for products offered by the web retailers, and provides one of the identified product recommendations in connection with a product page associated with one of the
					Inventors: Michael Stoppelman 
		    












Product recommendations based on collaborative filtering of user data
		      04/21/11 - 20110093358 - A system gathers user behavior data from a group of web retailers and/or non-web retailers, analyzes the user behavior data to identify product recommendations for products offered by the web retailers, and provides one of the identified product recommendations in connection with a product page associated with one of the
					Inventors: Michael Stoppelman 
		    












Product recommendations based on collaborative filtering of user data
		      12/03/09 - 20090299880 - A system gathers user behavior data from a group of web retailers and/or non-web retailers, analyzes the user behavior data to identify product recommendations for products offered by the web retailers, and provides one of the identified product recommendations in connection with a product page associated with one of the
					Inventors: Michael Stoppelman 
		    



### Michael Stoppelman patent invention listingsThe bibliographic references displayed about Michael Stoppelman's patents are for a recent sample of Michael Stoppelman's publicly published patent applications. The inventor/author may have additional bibliographic citations listed at the USPTO.gov. FreshPatents.com is not associated or affiliated in any way with the author/inventor or the United States Patent/Trademark Office but is providing this non-comprehensive sample listing for educational and research purposes using public bibliographic data published and disseminated from the United States Patent/Trademark Office public datafeed. This information is also available for free on the USPTO.gov website.  If Michael Stoppelman filed recent patent applications under another name, spelling or location then those applications could be listed on an alternate page. If no bibliographic references are listed here, it is possible there are no recent filings or there is a technical issue with the listing--in that case, we recommend doing a search on the USPTO.gov website. ###Sign up for the FreshPatents.com FREE Keyword Monitor and check for keyword phrases (ie. "RFID" , "wireless", "web development", "fuel cells" etc.)...You will be notified when new patent applications and inventions are published that match your keywords. Also you can save for later research public patent/invention documents using our FREE Organizer. It takes only 30 seconds to sign up or login.Advertise on FreshPatents.com - Rates & Info###Design/code © 2014 FreshContext LLC/Freshpatents.com.Patent data source: patents published by the United States Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO)Information published here is for research/educational purposes only (and in conjunction with our Keyword Monitor) and is not meant to be used in place of the full USPTO patent document/images or a comprehensive patent archive search. Complete official applications are on file at the USPTO and may contain additional data/images. FreshPatents.com is not affiliated with or endorsed by the USPTO or firms/individuals or products/designs/ideas related to listed patents and there may be applicable trademarks or servicemarks within the documents.FreshPatents.com Support - Terms & Conditions







Yelp's Jeremy Stoppelman will do it.... his way | Fortune.comFeaturesSearchSearchDivorceAnthony Scarmucci’s Wife Has Reportedly Filed for DivorceFortune 500Amazon Has a New Way For You To Pick Up PackagesCOMPARECARDSSPONSOREDDonald TrumpPresident Trump Just Dumped His Chief of Staff Reince PriebusYelp founder Jeremy Stoppelman loves to cook. His kitchen counters are stacked with cookbooks. Photo: Joe Pugliese40 Under 40Yelp CEO Jeremy Stoppelman ignored advice from Peter Thiel and Elon Musk and succeeded anywayDaniel RobertsSep 19, 2013When Jeremy Stoppelman was applying to Harvard Business School in 2003, he asked his boss at PayPal, Elon Musk, to write him a letter of recommendation."I don't think Jeremy needs to go to Harvard," Musk recalls typing. "I just want to make that clear. My personal recommendation is that he doesn't go." Stoppelman got in and attended anyway, only to drop out a year later so he could start Yelp, a user-driven business-review service, with his friend Russ Simmons.Since then Yelp (yelp) has grown into a multi-national publicly traded company with 1,700 employees and a market cap of $4 billion. Twice Stoppelman has rejected offers to buy Yelp, first for a reported $500 million, from Google (goog), then for $1 billion from Yahoo (yhoo). In July the San Francisco-based company bought SeatMe, a reservations service that competes with the likes of OpenTable (open), for $12.5 million. Second-quarter 2013 revenue of $55 million exceeded expectations. Traffic is at an all-time high, up 75%, year over year outside the U.S.  The library of Yelp reviews now stands at 42.5 million, and the site has 108 million monthly uniques -- more people than ever in over 120 cities visit Yelp to find the best dim sum, dry cleaner, dermatologist, or dog park.Despite a robust user base, an international footprint, and an aggressive push into advertising sales, Yelp, like so many other Internet darlings, has yet to turn a profit. It's a bit of a trope: a young, ambitious founder-CEO (Stoppelman is 35 and No. 16 on our 40 Under 40 list) who has taken the long view against critics clamoring for a quicker path to profitability. But that's exactly who Stoppelman is, and that's the lengthy course he has set for his company.RelatedAppleBozoma Saint John Leaving Apple, Report SaysAppleBozoma Saint John Leaving Apple, Report SaysMuch of Yelp's success is due to its users -- the website is only as valuable as its content, and it has content only if people actively participate. As such, when Yelp opens in a new market abroad, it does so by hiring "scouts" to build up a library of reviews, then adding community managers to spread the word. The maneuver is not cheap, although it has earned Yelp kudos as one of the first web companies to expand city-by-city, via on-the-ground efforts -- now the norm for many other convenience startups such as Uber and Airbnb. Yelp launched in Brazil, New Zealand, and the Czech Republic this year, and Stoppelman says Yelp could be profitable "if we did reduce our investment in the business." The second thorn is even thornier: getting small businesses to advertise on Yelp. Small businesses invest $2 billion a year in the YP Real Yellow Pages, and the company's digital-advertising business had seven times Yelp's revenue in 2012. Yelp needs to bite into that pie, and to do so, it's aggressively ramping up its ad-sales staff, which currently includes about half of all Yelp staffers. Right now only 51,400 small businesses advertise with Yelp, out of some 20 million in the U.S.There is, however, some controversy surrounding just how Yelp earns new customers. Do its search results favor businesses that pay to advertise? Might it punish those that decline? Yelp's review filter, which is meant to weed out artificial reviews both positive (such as a friend giving another friend's business five stars) and negative (competitors slamming one another), has drawn much of the ire. During a Yelp "town hall" in Hollywood in August, a number of people stood to complain that after they declined to advertise, their best reviews disappeared. Stoppelman insists unequivocally that advertising has nothing to do with the review filter. "Salespeople have no ability to do anything with reviews -- never have, never will," he says. Some sales reps at Yelp suggest that would-be customers often learn about Yelp during a sales call and decline to advertise, but then solicit friends to quickly write five-star reviews. The system then spots those reviews and filters them out.Yelp's challenge is to prove to businesses they can get more from the company if they pay for its services than they can by using it for free. This summer Yelp launched Yelp Platform, which allows users to order food directly from the website or app. As a result, Yelp can fish for new business by sharing these "leads," such as how many people called a restaurant, clicked its website, or looked up directions from within Yelp's listing. Yelp Platform is the first significant e-commerce offering from Yelp. As Jefferies analyst Brian Fitzgerald says, "Not only do you cull the reviews, but you help that business book tables -- you help it get customers. There's a whole suite of products there that could be integrated. It could unseat OpenTable." And yet, what is free on Yelp is still what is most compelling. About 1.2 million business owners (far more than the 51,400 that pay) are utilizing Yelp's suite of free tools, which they can access by "claiming" their owner page at biz.yelp.com. Rakesh Agrawal, an analyst at ReDesign Mobile, says utilizing Yelp's free tools "is one of the best things you can do for your small business," but he's less impressed with its advertising services (he has shorted the stock): "The thing I highly recommend for businesses is, instead of giving your money to Yelp, give your time." Stoppelman's goal is to build a product so compelling that they will do both.Stoppelman is sitting in on a product meeting in Levchin's, the conference room named after Max Levchin, the PayPal co-founder who gave Yelp an early $1 million investment. Stoppelman is dressed in J. Crew, head to toe. (He's friends with the retailer's CEO, Mickey Drexler, who persuaded Stoppelman to come in for a full fitting when he was in New York.) In today's meeting he and a few engineers are considering the look of a screen on Yelp's mobile app, one that shows up after customers check in somewhere. One engineer shows a possible response after a user visits a store and answers a question about the experience. "Dolla dolla bills, y'all! That was fun. Let's try another," reads the screen. Stoppelman says, "Can we do a ... sound effect? Like, obviously, we could have 'Cha-ching!' " The group laughs.Stoppelman isn't the most gregarious guy -- "It's not my first thought to go out and meet people," he says. He is quiet, reserved, and prone to pick up new hobbies with scholarly single-mindedness. He taught himself guitar by watching videos online. But around the office he loosens up. Miriam Warren, vice president of new markets, says that over time, "I've seen him get more comfortable in his own skin." He sends out weekly videos to the entire staff (called the "Stoppelblog") to give short company updates. Stoppelman's younger brother, Michael, Yelp's VP of engineering, is the opposite: chatty, animated. Around the office they call him "M-Stop." Jeremy has no nickname.And yet in a business setting, he has always been anything but shy. At PayPal he was unafraid to speak out, and it's something he encourages Yelp employees to do regardless of rank. Perhaps it is a residual from being surrounded by extremely competitive, ambitious leaders like Musk, Thiel, and Levchin when he was just a young engineer not long out of the University of Illinois. "The way he moved up the ladder at PayPal," Levchin says, "was that he was very self-assured, which is pretty impressive for someone in his early twenties." Once, Stoppelman sent an angry email around, critiquing a new feature. "He clearly thought that he was being brash or sort of 'telling the man,'" Levchin says, "and a whole bunch of us on the executive team were like, 'Oh, crap, he's totally right, we have to go change this.' He had absolutely no problem criticizing people above him, and being blunt about it."Nowadays he is equally demanding and obsessive about Yelp, his "baby." In the early days of the company, he once scolded Keith Rabois, now a Yelp boardmember, for wearing a Yelp t-shirt to the gym. Rabois protested that he was promoting the company, but Stoppelman told him it was a high-quality, vintage t-shirt and that he shouldn't "damage the brand" by working out in it.He was similarly concerned with establishing a culture at Yelp -- one that he likes to say isn't a "burnout" culture. The workplace is far from the showy funhouses of other buzzy tech startups. It is not a company that lures employees with perks. "We're not Google," Stoppelman says. "We don't have lobster stuffed with caviar every day. It's never been about how we compete on throwing nice things at employees." Indeed, a large fridge in its modest cafeteria is filled, comically, with only condiments and sliced deli meats. Employees play chef, fixing "Yelpwiches" for lunch. (A flier on the fridge in August, also posted all over the San Francisco offices, announces, "THE GREAT YELP MOVE IS UPON US" and encourages employees to remove food before the entire staff relocates a few blocks away to new, larger offices on New Montgomery Street.) "It does not have an intense culture at all," Rabois says, "whereas clearly at PayPal we did. I get the impression Tesla does. You create your own custom cocktail." Yelp's cocktail is an engineer-driven team, passionate about the wonky parts, but with a playful side. Colleagues say that Stoppelman knows his strengths -- product and engineering -- and focuses on them.Today's product meeting is focused on Yelp's fastest-growing and arguably most important slice: the mobile app. Mobile sees 30% of all Yelp's traffic (that goes up to 50% on weekends) and 59% of all searches. People are using mobile more; thus, it is one of three companywide "themes" for the year. The other two are its international expansion (with a strong emphasis on integrating traffic from Qype, the German competitor Yelp acquired for $50 million a year ago) and, you guessed it, selling more ads (internally they're calling it "closing the loop with local businesses"). But competition in the mobile-ad space is fierce, and some critics say that though Yelp was an early leader in mobile, it waited too long on mobile advertising. It didn't start selling display ads in its app until March, and while 40% of ads show up on mobile, it could have been higher by now.In June, Google launched Carousel, a local-search product that displays a ticker of businesses and seems squarely aimed at Yelp. Yelp relies on Google for more than half of its traffic, but Stoppelman says that worries him less and less, "even as they've gotten increasingly aggressive in trying to put roadblocks in front of consumers in getting to the Yelp content." In addition to Google, there is Facebook -- in August it launched Graph Search, which offers you up restaurants your friends have liked. "It's really Google and Facebook who are their main competitors for local advertising dollars online," says Wunderlich analyst Blake Harper, who believes the biggest risk for Yelp is that customers turn to one of these giants "because they don't like Yelp's tactics or the way they filter reviews." Below those dual behemoths, there are competitors like TripAdvisor, which focuses on hotels.If it isn't an already-established giant, perhaps the company to "build the next mousetrap" that Stoppelman says he fears will be a brand new startup, an unimagined competitor. Peter Thiel, an early investor and another mentor of Stoppelman's from their PayPal days, says that Google isn't worth worrying about. "If a much bigger company was going to be able to take them out, they already would have done so. It's not that easy to build these local communities in every city." Indeed, it seems as though Stoppelman's focus on investing in communities and building a product that delights users (both customers and business owners) outweighs his concern with profitability. Thiel says he thinks Yelp will still be around in 2030. If it is, it will likely be because Stoppelman ignored the quick path to profits in favor of the slow climb toward an involved user base.Of course, Stoppelman has ignored advice from his sages before -- once with Musk, and again with Thiel. In 2011, he and Thiel were out for a run (something they used to do a few times a year "at some critical inflection point for the business," Thiel says) and they got to talking about the state of Yelp. Stoppelman was considering taking his company public. Thiel told him not to. Of course, the rest is history: Stoppelman did, and Yelp's stock, which made its debut at $22 a share in March 2012, is now around $65, up 166% from a year ago.A shorter version of this story ran in the October 7, 2013 issue of Fortune.Customer ServiceSite MapPrivacy PolicyAdvertisingAd ChoicesTerms of UseYour California Privacy RightsCareers© 2017 Time Inc. All rights reserved.All products and services featured are based solely on editorial selection. FORTUNE may receive compensation for some links to products and services on this website. Quotes delayed at least 15 minutes. Market data provided by Interactive Data. ETF and Mutual Fund data provided by Morningstar, Inc. Dow Jones Terms & Conditions: http://www.djindexes.com/mdsidx/html/tandc/indexestandcs.html. S&P Index data is the property of Chicago Mercantile Exchange Inc. and its licensors. All rights reserved. Terms & Conditions. Powered and implemented by Interactive Data Managed SolutionsSubscribeSearchHomeFortune 500All RankingsTechLeadershipVentureFortune InsidersMost Powerful WomenAutomotiveCareersEnergy & EnvironmentExecutive TravelFinanceHealthTIME HealthInternationalLooking ForwardRetailMarketsMagazineNewslettersVideosFortune ConferencesFollow FORTUNEShareShare on FacebookPost on TwitterEmail this storyShare on RedditShare on PinterestShare on LinkedIn 






Michael Stoppelman, VP of Engineering, Yelp


























&timesJavascript is disabled
























Market Profiles



Login
Sign up



Login


Sign up








 







 Edit

Person













Michael Stoppelman



VP of Engineering
at
Yelp


Location: San Francisco, CA





Add to My Lists

Claim

Share


Copy the following code on your page/blog


Suggested widget size



Mobile



Desktop









Michael Stoppelman



VP of Engineering
at
Yelp


Location: San Francisco, CA




Add to My Lists

Claim

Share


Copy the following code on your page/blog


Suggested widget size



Mobile



Desktop




Michael joined Yelp in 2007 as a software engineer to help to rebuild the search engine. Over the years, Michael was promoted to more senior roles and led developer recruiting; as Vice President of Engineering, he is now responsible for overseeing the company’s rapidly expanding engineering team and leads the company’s technical recruiting efforts. Prior to Yelp, Michael was a senior software engineer and tech lead for the AdSense Traffic Quality team at Google. Michael holds a B.S. in computer science from Purdue University.



4

Companies in Career





N/A

Related Markets





4

Colleagues





1

Related Investments








Alias
N/A



Industry
Computer Software




Tags
Architecture, Python, SQL, Apache, Cloud Computing, Shell Scripting, REST, Perl, Java




Topics of Influence












N/A







N/A






























Careers








Achievements








Investments








Related People






 Edit
View all 



Michael StoppelmanCareer (5)






Mar-2011




Yelp



VP of Engineering







2009 to 2011




Yelp.com



Director of Engineering







Mar-2007 to Feb-2009




Yelp.com



Software Engineer







Aug-2003 to Mar-2007




Google



Senior Software Engineer







May-2002 to Aug-2002




MIT/Whitehead Inst.



intern








Competencies










 Edit
View all 



Michael StoppelmanEducation






2003



Purdue University


Computer Science









 Edit



Michael StoppelmanAchievements and Recognitions





Add Milestone


No milestones has been recorded for Michael Stoppelman






 Edit



Michael StoppelmanLinks





Add Link


No links has been recorded for Michael Stoppelman






View all 



Michael StoppelmanInvestments/Acquisitions










Wish


Since Mar-2011

Company status: PRIVATE












Michael StoppelmanInvestments Representing Others





No investment reps has been recorded for Michael Stoppelman








Michael StoppelmanRelated People








Colleagues at Yelp







Lanny Baker

Chief Financial Officer
Apr-2016









Diane Irvine

Chairwoman
Sep-2015









Travis Brooks

Search & Data Science Product Manager
Oct-2014









Colleen Curtis

VP of European Marketing
Oct-2013








View all 
Peers (39)







Edward Ho

VP, Engineering of Twitter









Brian  McClendon

Research Professor of The University of Kansas









Anna Patterson

Founder and Managing Partner at Gradient Ventures of Google









Paul Antaki

VP Engineering of StumbleUpon









Brian D. Murphy

CTO of Tumblr









Hari Vasudev

Senior Vice President of Flipkart












View all 



Michael StoppelmanRecommended Market Profiles (2)








Marketing Environment (ChiefMartec.com)

10,000 or More employees
33 companies








Martech Content Marketing (Abridged)

10,000 or More employees
33 companies


















 

	Purdue Alumni Association - Community Home






























































Search Content:  















Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest
Instagram
Search









Search Content:  











 Site Menu
Member Login











  Half-Price Life for New Grads   Half-Price Life for New Grads Join now to receive 50% off life membership and a complimentary gift     Boiler Networking   Boiler Networking Search our extensive list of worldwide Purdue Alumni networks by location, affinity, or school.    The Game Master   The Game Master The fate of Boilermaker football rests on the shoulders of Jeff Brohm    Fall Member Tailgate   Fall Member Tailgate Save the date for our Fall Member Tailgate, Friday, September 8  








      Commencement Open House     Commencement Open House Posted on Jul 28, 2017  Congratulations to our newest alumni! Graduates and their families are invited to stop by Boilermaker Station in PMU 118 for the Commencement Open House, July 31–August 4.  Receive a free gift when you purchase a life membership.    Read More           Brazen Online Networking     Brazen Online Networking Posted on Jul 26, 2017  Join us for a Brazen online networking event on August from 12:00–1:00 p.m. ET. The timed chat sessions allow you build meaningful connections with other Boilermakers in your region. Join the conversation.    Read More           Superfan     Superfan Posted on Jul 21, 2017  Holocaust survivor found his passion, sense of belonging in Purdue sports    Read More           Ruling the Mound      Ruling the Mound  Posted on Jul 20, 2017  Junior Tanner Andrews bounces back from a hard hit    Read More           PBAO Homecoming Events     PBAO Homecoming Events Posted on Jul 18, 2017  Make plans now to attend the Purdue Black Alumni Organization (PBAO) Homecoming Events September 22–24.    Read More           Calling all alumni! Make your voice heard     Calling all alumni! Make your voice heard Posted on Jul 17, 2017  Have you completed the Purdue Alumni survey? Share your thoughts and help positively impact fellow Boilermakers. Plus, you could win a Purdue prize pack!    Read More           Purdue Alumni Band     Purdue Alumni Band Posted on Jul 14, 2017  Celebrate your lifelong connection to the "All-American" Marching Band during Homecoming, September 22-23.    Read More           5,000 Members in 50 Days     5,000 Members in 50 Days Posted on Jul 13, 2017  Join the network of distinguished Purdue graduates around the globe.    Read More         Purdue Alumni Association Sponsors Posted on Jul 12, 2017                    BGR Leaders Network     BGR Leaders Network Posted on Jul 12, 2017  The BGR Leaders Alumni Network unites BGR leaders, past and present. From Corn Camp to what is now BGR, the student orientation welcome week is a part of Purdue that creates lifelong memories. The new BGR alumni network provides opportunities to stay involved on campus or off, to support Purdue University and BGR in ways that are meaningful to you.    Read More           Objects of Affection     Objects of Affection Posted on Jul 11, 2017  Judy Nixon purchased her first copy of A Visit From St. Nicholas in 1976 for $5.95 for a grad school project on children’s literature. At the time, the HSSE education librarian had no idea she would eventually acquire around 500 versions of Clement C. Moore’s classic holiday poem, more commonly known as “’Twas the Night Before Christmas.”    Read More           Featured Young Alumni: Kyle Lauderdale     Featured Young Alumni: Kyle Lauderdale Posted on Jul 10, 2017  Kyle resides in Chicago, Illinois, where he is general manager at Lauderdale Electric, an electrical construction company that focuses on commercial projects. His time at Purdue was well spent, as he was able to develop a network of connections that has led to many business clients. Kyle learned the importance of hard work and time management as a member of the Purdue baseball team.    Read More           Team V     Team V Posted on Jul 07, 2017  The 30th Space Wing is the host unit of the 99,000-acre base and home to the Western Range, manages Department of Defense space and missile testing, and launches satellites into polar orbit. Vandenberg comprises approximately 2,700 military personnel, 1,300 government civilians, and 3,000 contractors — collectively known as Team V.    Read More           Down with the Pecking Order     Down with the Pecking Order Posted on Jul 07, 2017  Geneticist's 'Superchicken' Research Takes Flight As Metaphor For Effective Team Management    Read More           Travel with Purdue     Travel with Purdue Posted on Jul 06, 2017  Join fellow Boilermakers for the trip of a lifetime. Our alumni travel program offers a variety of trips, destinations, and price ranges, so we're sure there is one to please you!    Read More           I Am An American     I Am An American Posted on Jul 05, 2017  Speak them firmly, speak them proudly, speak them gratefully.    Read More           PASE Family-Life Membership     PASE Family-Life Membership Posted on Jul 04, 2017  Parents and guardians of current students can now purchase a family membership for $125 for four years.  The PASE Family-Life Membership includes a four year PASE membership for the student, annual membership for up to two parents or guardians during the student's undergraduate career, and a life membership for the student upon graduation.    Read More           Boilermaker Pride Store     Boilermaker Pride Store Posted on Jul 03, 2017  Your source for official Purdue Alumni gear!  Members enjoy a 10% discount off their order.    Read More           July Desktop Calendars     July Desktop Calendars Posted on Jun 30, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Student Picnics     Student Picnics Posted on Jun 29, 2017  Purdue Alumni clubs around the country will be celebrating summer and welcoming incoming students with picnics and cookouts. Check our regional alumni networks events page to see if there's a student picnic near you.    Read More           True American Spirit Tour     True American Spirit Tour Posted on Jun 28, 2017  Join us to experience something uniquely American: the Bourbon Trail of famous distilleries in Kentucky. Learn about this industry, from its humble beginnings when Scottish and Scots-Irish settlers began to farm the area in the late 18th century to the billion-dollar market of today.    Read More           Brazen Online Networking     Brazen Online Networking Posted on Jun 27, 2017  Don't miss out on this incredible opportunity to connect with fellow Purdue alumni around the world! Join fellow alumni to share your experiences, exchange career tips, and build your professional network — all online. Come build real relationships and connections in a purposeful, exciting way. It's free, it's for only an hour and it's fun!    Read More           Join us for a Golf Outing     Join us for a Golf Outing Posted on Jun 26, 2017  Hit the links with fellow Boilermakers! Take a look at our regional events calendar to see if there's a club hosting a golf outing this summer near you.     Read More           Purdue Alumni in East Asia     Purdue Alumni in East Asia Posted on Jun 23, 2017  Mark your calendar — your Purdue Alumni Association is coming to East Asia! Join us for networking events in Taipei, Bangkok, Jakarta, Singapore, and Kuala Lumpur in August. Registration is opening soon.   Read More           Benefit Highlight     Benefit Highlight Posted on Jun 20, 2017  Find exclusive discounts from popular restaurants, retailers, hotels, theme parks, and more.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Chris Vogt     Alumni Profile: Chris Vogt Posted on Jun 19, 2017  Chris Vogt (T’11) knows a thing or two about gravity and timing. A juggler since the age of 9, he’s balanced on unicycles and avoided flying knives in his performances. So it makes perfect sense that gravity and timing come into play in his work as a project engineer and designer at UTC Aerospace Systems in Phoenix, Arizona.    Read More           Alumni Leaders Conference     Alumni Leaders Conference Posted on Jun 15, 2017  Save the date! Make plans now to join us for the 2017 Alumni Leaders Conference held in conjunction with Homecoming, September 22, 2017.    Read More           Boiler Boosters     Boiler Boosters Posted on Jun 15, 2017  Flex your social media muscle! Share exclusive content with the click of a button and earn points for Purdue prizes.    Read More           PASE Membership     PASE Membership Posted on Jun 14, 2017  Join the largest student group on campus and receive a 2017 membership kit honoring John Purdue!    Read More           Refer A Student     Refer A Student Posted on Jun 13, 2017  Purdue actively communicates with students as early as 8th grade, providing information they and their families can use to prepare for college admission and, more importantly, college success. If you know a student who is interested in Purdue, invite them to get on our mailing list. Students on our mailing list will receive important updates about application processes and deadlines as well as information about academic programs related to their personal interests.    Read More           Senior Week Photos     Senior Week Photos Posted on Jun 12, 2017  Graduates donned their caps and gowns across campus for Senior Week Photo Day. Check out our photo galleries.    Read More           Boilermakers Are Headed to Taipei     Boilermakers Are Headed to Taipei Posted on Jun 09, 2017  The Purdue men’s basketball team has the honor of representing the Unites States at the World University Games in Taipei, Taiwan, this August. Organized by the International University Sports Federation, the World University Games is staged every two years in a different city around the world. This is your exciting opportunity to mingle with fellow Purdue alumni and watch the Boilermakers play.    Read More           Chicago Alumni Weekend     Chicago Alumni Weekend Posted on Jun 08, 2017  Join fellow Boilermakers for a Purdue alumni weekend in Chicago this June! Celebrate your Purdue pride while networking with other alums at a cocktail reception, and bring the whole family for a museum outing with food and giveaways.    Read More           Gateway Membership     Gateway Membership Posted on Jun 05, 2017  Congratulations grads! Learn about the benefits of your Purdue Alumni Gateway Membership!    Read More           View from the Lab: Design Shop     View from the Lab: Design Shop Posted on Jun 02, 2017  Materials and processes is a required lab course for students majoring in industrial design, but it’s open to all art and design students.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni: Cory Smith     Featured Young Alumni: Cory Smith Posted on Jun 01, 2017  Cory Smith (HHS’09) earned his bachelor’s degree in financial counseling and planning. Today, he resides in Indianapolis, Indiana, where he is the owner and advisor at Indy Wealth Solutions LLC. His degree from Purdue trained him to better understand the financial planning needs of clients, develop solutions to fit those needs, and relate the solutions in a clear way.    Read More           June Desktop Calendars     June Desktop Calendars Posted on May 31, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Brazen Online Networking     Brazen Online Networking Posted on May 30, 2017  Our next Brazen online networking event is June 6. Make meaningful connections through purposeful discussions with fellow Boilermakers. Get registered now to be part of the conversation.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni: Rahul Srinivasa Raghavan     Featured Young Alumni: Rahul Srinivasa Raghavan Posted on May 26, 2017  Rahul Srinivasa Raghavan earned his master’s degree in electrical and computer engineering in 2009. While at Purdue, Rahul was a graduate research assistant for a project funded by Siemens Healthineers (then Siemens Healthcare). Today, Rahul resides in Chicago, Illinois, where he is an assistant director of technology at Rival Systems.    Read More           Purdue Alumni Membership Drive     Purdue Alumni Membership Drive Posted on May 25, 2017  During the months of June & July we are gearing up for a large membership drive with the goal of obtaining 5,000 new members! The Purdue Alumni Association has teamed up with DirectLine Technologies to assist us in our efforts. If you hear from them please know they are an approved vendor. Thank you for your support of the Purdue Alumni Association. Hail Purdue!    Read More           Alumni Faculty & Staff Doughnut Day     Alumni Faculty & Staff Doughnut Day Posted on May 24, 2017  Purdue employees who are alumni are invited to Boilermaker Station in room 108 of the Purdue Memorial Union for National Doughnut Day on June 2. Purdue Alumni members will receive a free mug as well!    Read More           Making a Splash     Making a Splash Posted on May 18, 2017  Despite winning back-to-back 500 freestyle state championships and breaking the national public high school record in the 400 free relay team in her senior year, swimming had started to feel mundane for Kaersten Meitz. But coming to Purdue made her fall in love with the sport all over again.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Asta Baškauskaitė     Alumni Profile: Asta Baškauskaitė Posted on May 17, 2017  Asta (Baskauskas) Baškauskaitė (S’80) has merged her love of quality design with her passion to support and contribute to Lithuania. The daughter of refugees, Baškauskaitė grew up living a dual cultural life.    Read More           Reamer Alumni Network     Reamer Alumni Network Posted on May 16, 2017  Announcing the new Reamer Alumni Network that is uniting generations of Reamers past and present.    Read More           Nurses In Demand     Nurses In Demand Posted on May 15, 2017  Undergraduate admissions will increase gradually over the next three years, ultimately admitting 200 a year. Why? Demand. Some 1.1 million more nurses will be needed over the next seven years, the US Bureau of Labor Statistics projects.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Javier Saade     Alumni Profile: Javier Saade Posted on May 12, 2017  When Javier Saade (M’92) was growing up in Puerto Rico, parental guidance, persistence, and Purdue were all waiting to play a part in his life; they eventually would help him become one of the highest-ranking Hispanics in the federal government and a voice for 28 million small businesses and startups in the United States.    Read More           Boilermaker Legacy Families     Boilermaker Legacy Families Posted on May 11, 2017  Watch this special video that shares the impact of community and scholarship support in making college dreams come true.    Read More           Found: Pappy’s Corner Booth     Found: Pappy’s Corner Booth Posted on May 11, 2017  A visit to Pappy’s Sweet Shop is a step back in time. Opened in 1927, the eatery has long been a favorite gathering place for students. Located in the Union Commons on the ground floor of the Purdue Memorial Union, the Pappy’s of today harkens back to the diner heydey of the 1950s.    Read More           Class Ring Ceremony     Class Ring Ceremony Posted on May 10, 2017  The official class ring of Purdue University symbolically captures the essence of the university and commemorates the unique and lifelong connection among Boilermakers.View photos from our 2017 Class Ring Ceremony held at Dauch Alumni Center.    Read More           30 Seconds with Charlotte Tuggle     30 Seconds with Charlotte Tuggle Posted on May 09, 2017  Tuggle is a first-generation college student from Winston, Georgia, and a senior news intern at WBAA Radio.    Read More           Commencement Open House     Commencement Open House Posted on May 08, 2017  Congratulations to our newest alumni! Graduates and their families are invited to stop by Boilermaker Station in PMU 118 for the Commencement Open House, May 12-14. We will also be offering complimentary souvenir family photos.    Read More           National Astronaut Day     National Astronaut Day Posted on May 05, 2017  Purdue has a proud legacy as the Cradle of Astronauts. Learn more about this elite group of Boilermakers.    Read More           New Horizons     New Horizons Posted on May 04, 2017  The first New Horizons grant has been awarded by Purdue University to a team of researchers proposing to create a program in Extraterrestrial Habitat Engineering — believed to be the first such program at any university.    Read More           Nominate a Special Boilermaker     Nominate a Special Boilermaker Posted on May 03, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association is seeking nominations for the Special Boilermaker Award. Established in 1981, the award honors a member of the Purdue faculty or staff who has contributed significantly to the improvement of the quality of life and/or the betterment of the educational experience for a substantial number of Purdue students.    Read More           60th Grand Prix     60th Grand Prix Posted on May 02, 2017  Check out our photo gallery from the greatest spectacle in college racing!    Read More           May Desktop Calendars     May Desktop Calendars Posted on May 01, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Lifesaving Donation     Lifesaving Donation Posted on Apr 28, 2017  Four longtime friends, Judy and Curt Hall and Mary-Claire and Mark Cartwright, hope to inspire others through their story of organ donation.    Read More           Glamorous Riviera     Glamorous Riviera Posted on Apr 26, 2017  Mediterranean Europe's beautiful landscapes and cosmopolitan flair offer a destination rife with history and glamour.    Read More           Brazen Online Networking     Brazen Online Networking Posted on Apr 25, 2017  Our next Brazen online networking event is May 2. Make meaningful connections through purposeful discussions with fellow Boilermakers. Get registered now to be part of the conversation.    Read More           Let's Meet in Miami     Let's Meet in Miami Posted on Apr 24, 2017  Thank you to the more than 100 Boilermakers from around the world who joined us in Miami for our inaugural global alumni event! Check out the photo gallery from the event.    Read More           60th Grand Prix     60th Grand Prix Posted on Apr 21, 2017  Join the Purdue Grand Prix Alumni Organization for the greatest spectacle in college racing!    Read More           Senior Send Off     Senior Send Off Posted on Apr 20, 2017  Nearly 2000 graduating students participated in Senior Send Off, sponsored by the Purdue Alumni Association. Check out the photo gallery.    Read More           Boilermaker Station     Boilermaker Station Posted on Apr 19, 2017  The Boilermaker Station is an engagement space for students, alumni, and friends to gather and enjoy a modern, interactive experience celebrating the Old Gold and Black. Located in room 108 of the Purdue Memorial Union, across from the Purdue Welcome Center, the space features a 98-inch touchscreen display highlighting Purdue University’s traditions, milestones, leaders, and accomplished alumni.    Read More           Journey to Appleville     Journey to Appleville Posted on Apr 18, 2017  Five questions with author Veronica Appleton (LA'10), who's on a mission to share stories reflecting the everyday life of multicultural families.    Read More           Commencement Brunch     Commencement Brunch Posted on Apr 17, 2017  Make plans now to celebrate your graduate at the Purdue Alumni commencement brunch May 12–14 at the Purdue Memorial Union.    Read More           Trending: Women In Ag     Trending: Women In Ag Posted on Apr 14, 2017  There’s certainly nothing new about the presence of hardworking women in an agricultural setting. On the farm, perhaps the quintessential family business, women and girls have long shared in the chores of planting, harvesting, and livestock management. They also may have taken the lead on squaring accounts, teaching children, or figuring better ways to get beef, bacon, or crops to the market. What may be changing, however, is the growing number of leadership roles that call upon a female perspective in farming and throughout the ag industry.    Read More           Senior Send Off     Senior Send Off Posted on Apr 13, 2017  This fun farewell for graduates will include lunch from Subway, music, opportunities to win prizes, pictures with Purdue Pete and the World's Largest Drum, and attendees will get their very own Purdue Alumni pint glass. Plus, learn about your Purdue Alumni Gateway membership.    Read More           Start to Finish     Start to Finish Posted on Apr 12, 2017  There’s no telling what might happen over the course of any four years — though NCAA student-athletes can keep score through team results, personal best marks, even grade-point averages. The stories of Obokhare Ikpefan, a senior track & field athlete, and Christa Szalach, a senior soccer player, may unfold in their struggles.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni: Jessica Mattingly     Featured Young Alumni: Jessica Mattingly Posted on Apr 11, 2017  Jessica (Dum) Mattingly (HHS’09) majored in hospitality and tourism management. While working toward her degree, Jessica interned at Marriott North Indianapolis, Hyatt Regency in Kansas City, Missouri, and Meeting Services Unlimited in Indianapolis, Indiana.    Read More           2017 Nearly Naked Mile     2017 Nearly Naked Mile Posted on Apr 10, 2017  Rain didn't stop PASE's 10th annual Nearly Naked Mile, which brought in clothing donations from across campus to support Trinity Life Ministry. Check out the photo gallery.   Read More           Cutting Edge     Cutting Edge Posted on Apr 07, 2017  For researchers at Purdue, the game plan for cancer isn’t finding one master key but cutting many and in some cases altering the tumblers in the locks themselves, changing the very nature of the disease.    Read More           Save the Date for Purdue Day of Giving     Save the Date for Purdue Day of Giving Posted on Apr 06, 2017  Mark your calendar for April 26, 2017, the fourth annual Purdue Day of Giving. Keep an eye on your e-mail inbox and social media for instructions on specific challenges throughout the day.    Read More           Invisible Identities     Invisible Identities Posted on Apr 05, 2017  The minds behind the Purdue Identities Project (PIP) want to take away the hurt and the secrets. PIP is leading a charge for acceptance for anyone who has a hidden identity — an illness, mental health issue, minority sexual or ethnic status, veteran status, or any other element that might make one feel “other.”    Read More           Tooth Bank     Tooth Bank Posted on Apr 03, 2017  Could saving your dental stem cells be the secret to treating future illness? Michael Byers thinks so.    Read More           April Desktop Calendars     April Desktop Calendars Posted on Mar 31, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Hitting the Sweet Spot     Hitting the Sweet Spot Posted on Mar 30, 2017  Things were looking dicey for Laura Gonzalez Escallon (S’13) toward the end of the LPGA’s Symetra Tour in October. She was ranked 11th heading into the IOA Golf Classic, when Hurricane Matthew hit.    Read More           Brazen Online Networking     Brazen Online Networking Posted on Mar 29, 2017  Our next Brazen online networking event is April 4. Make meaningful connections through purposeful discussions with fellow Boilermakers. Get registered now to be part of the conversation.    Read More           Flex Your Social Media Muscle     Flex Your Social Media Muscle Posted on Mar 28, 2017  Are you a proud Purdue alum who loves being social? Be a part of our Boiler Booster team. Share exclusive content with the click of a button and earn points for Purdue prizes! Also, make sure you’re following us on all of our social media accounts!    Read More           Eat. Donate. Support a Cause.     Eat. Donate. Support a Cause. Posted on Mar 27, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Student Experience (PASE) sponsors an annual fun run benefiting Trinity Life Ministry, a local nonprofit that helps men struggling with addiction. This year, PASE is looking to the community for additional support.  On Wednesday, March 29, plan to eat at Buffalo Wild Wings in West Lafayette. When you show your server this flyer, 15% of your total bill will be donated to Trinity Life Ministry.  Doing some spring cleaning? On Wednesday, April 5, PASE will be accepting donations of clothes, shoes, and linens at the Dauch Alumni Center from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m.    Read More           Let's Meet In Miami     Let's Meet In Miami Posted on Mar 24, 2017  Boilermakers from around the world are invited to join Purdue's inaugural global alumni event.    Read More           Sustaining Life     Sustaining Life Posted on Mar 23, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association is a proud and loyal family. We rely on our members to provide support for us to serve as the gateway through which a vibrant national and global network of accomplished Boilermakers stay connected and make a difference for today's students ... around the world. One Boilermaker alone is exceptional, yet together we are far stronger!    Read More           Palm Reader     Palm Reader Posted on Mar 22, 2017  Sit Jerry Palm (S’85) down to talk about the story of how he became one of college sports media’s most prominent names, and he can’t go more than a few minutes without using the word “geek” or some variation thereof.    Read More           Are You Biased? I Am.      Are You Biased? I Am.  Posted on Mar 21, 2017  In a recent TEDx Talk, Kristen Pressner (LA'92), global head of human resources for Roche Diagnostics, reveals the humbling moment she realized she was biased against women leaders, even though she is one. Watch the video to learn how to "flip it to test it" and uncover your own hidden biases.    Read More           Alumni Trustee Election     Alumni Trustee Election Posted on Mar 20, 2017  The Alumni Trustee election will take place from 8:00 a.m. (EST) on March 20, 2017, through 5:00 p.m. (Eastern) on March 24, 2017. The trustee, one of three elected by current members of the Purdue Alumni Association, will serve a three-year term on the Purdue University Board of Trustees commencing July 1, 2017.    Read More           Boiler UPdate     Boiler UPdate Posted on Mar 17, 2017  In order to provide you with the most meaningful, purposeful, and timely knowledge, the Boiler UPdate e-newsletter empowers you to self-select the content you personally wish to see from us, on a schedule of your choosing and in a format that best suits you. This customizable service will be exclusively available to Purdue Alumni members after April 15.    Read More           Inspired Design     Inspired Design Posted on Mar 16, 2017  It was an idea that started with an insect. And from there a masterpiece was born, as that drawing of a dead insect inspired “Urban Nature: A Recycled Sanctuary,” the installation that won first prize at the 2016 SOFA Chicago CONNECT student design competition.    Read More           Rock Around the Clock     Rock Around the Clock Posted on Mar 15, 2017  The 10th annual Boilermaker Ball was a celebration of Purdue traditions and scenes of yesteryear.    Read More           Creating Emotional Connections     Creating Emotional Connections Posted on Mar 14, 2017  United Through Reading serves military families by facilitating the bonding experience of reading aloud together.    Read More           NCAA Tournament Fan Headquarters     NCAA Tournament Fan Headquarters Posted on Mar 13, 2017  Get ready to watch the Boilermakers take on Vermont in the first round of the NCAA Tournament. Staff from the Purdue Alumni Association and John Purdue Club will be hosting fans at the Brass Alley in Milwaukee, WI.    Read More           Special Boilermaker     Special Boilermaker Posted on Mar 10, 2017  Nominations for the Special Boilermaker Award will be accepted through June 1.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Kyle Hjelmeseth     Alumni Profile: Kyle Hjelmeseth Posted on Mar 08, 2017  Building genuine relationships has been key for Kyle Hjelmeseth (LA’04) throughout his life. As a public relations student at Purdue, he recognized the importance of making connections and creating a memorable persona.    Read More           Member Appreciation Breakfast     Member Appreciation Breakfast Posted on Mar 07, 2017  Purdue Alumni members and one guest can start their Spring Fest experience off with breakfast at the Dauch Alumni Center. Registration ends April 4.    Read More           Breaking Records     Breaking Records Posted on Mar 06, 2017  Watch the Year In Review video to see campus highlights and record-breaking moments from 2016.    Read More           View from the Lab     View from the Lab Posted on Mar 03, 2017  Future generations of scientists learn the principles and applications of pharmaceutical manufacturing in a lab housed in the basement of Heine Hall.    Read More           Women's Big Ten Tournament HQ     Women's Big Ten Tournament HQ Posted on Mar 02, 2017  Get ready to watch the Boilermakers tear up the court in the Big Ten Tournament. Staff from the Purdue Alumni Association and John Purdue Club will be hosting fans at Scotty's Brewhouse in downtown Indianapolis.    Read More           Senior Class Representative     Senior Class Representative Posted on Mar 01, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association is looking for one exceptional person committed to being a part of the continued success of Purdue University, and dedicated to serving Purdue alumni around the world by joining the Purdue Alumni Board of Directors.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Jan Cervelli     Alumni Profile: Jan Cervelli Posted on Feb 28, 2017  The road to a college presidency can take many routes. For Janice Cervelli (A’79), an early turn came through meeting famed Purdue professor Harrison Flint. “He was a leader in the Department of Horticulture, and he was not only terrific as an instructor but as a teacher of teachers,” she says. “I was a teaching assistant, and he encouraged me to truly understand the different learning styles of students.”    Read More           March Desktop Calendars     March Desktop Calendars Posted on Feb 28, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Brazen Online Networking Event     Brazen Online Networking Event Posted on Feb 27, 2017  Our next Brazen online networking event is March 7. Make meaningful connections through purposeful discussions with fellow Boilermakers. It's free, it's for only an hour and it's fun!  Get registered now to be part of the conversation.    Read More           Potentially Harmful     Potentially Harmful Posted on Feb 24, 2017  Researchers from multiple institutions, including Purdue, teamed up to create the first worldwide analysis of invasive species threats, providing a global-scale outlook on how the introduction and spread of invasive species could shift in coming decades as a result of increasing globalization and climate change.    Read More           Senior Life Membership     Senior Life Membership Posted on Feb 23, 2017  Purdue alumni and friends ages 60+ receive 50% off life membership in the Purdue Alumni Association. That's only $500 for an individual Individual members and $625 for a joint membership. Affordable payment plans make it easier than ever to show your lifelong loyalty to Purdue.    Read More           Creating the Play     Creating the Play Posted on Feb 22, 2017  On the field, you will find Christa Szalach in position for whatever defensive play she needs to execute in order to give Purdue soccer the advantage. She is prepared to mark opposing forwards, provide angles for passing, and distribute the ball.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni: Elise Hardy     Featured Young Alumni: Elise Hardy Posted on Feb 21, 2017  Elise Hardy (HHS’12) majored in movement and sport science and minored in psychology, human development, and family studies. She also attended the University of Indianapolis and received a master’s degree in occupational therapy. While working toward her degrees, Elise interned as a research assistant with Dr. Laura Claxton for three years in Purdue’s Department of Health and Kinesiology.    Read More           Then & Now     Then & Now Posted on Feb 20, 2017  Mother's poignant words led Frank Brown to the pinnacle.    Read More           It's a Start     It's a Start Posted on Feb 17, 2017  Purdue Foundry helps potential startups plan for success.    Read More           Boiler UPdate     Boiler UPdate Posted on Feb 16, 2017  Our new personalized e-newsletter delivers campus content customized to your preferences at a schedule that's convenient for you.    Read More           Texas Entrepreneur Provides Tiny Places to Call Home     Texas Entrepreneur Provides Tiny Places to Call Home Posted on Feb 15, 2017  The same problem-solving skills that served St. Louis native Jon Meier (AAE’09) well in the oil and gas industry gave him solid footing when he stepped away from that field to pursue his passion. As the president of Backcountry Containers, Meier has taken on the task of turning shipping containers into inhabitable homes.    Read More           Valentine's Day Printables     Valentine's Day Printables Posted on Feb 14, 2017  Enjoy these sweet printables, available to Purdue Alumni members only.    Read More           Boilermaker Ball     Boilermaker Ball Posted on Feb 13, 2017  Don't be a wet rag!  It's your last chance to RSVP for the 10th annual Boilermaker Ball.    Read More           Purdue Express     Purdue Express Posted on Feb 09, 2017  “All aboard, pack your bag,” the 10 high-energy members of the Purdue Express sing, rap, dance, and shout in a fast-paced 30-minute stage performance highlighting student opportunities at Purdue.  Their goal: Encourage underrepresented minority students to become Boilermakers.    Read More           Young Alumni Membership     Young Alumni Membership Posted on Feb 08, 2017  Purdue Alumni has introduced a special membership rate for ages 35 and under.  Join today!    Read More           Purdue Creamery     Purdue Creamery Posted on Feb 07, 2017  From the mid-1910s until 1969, Purdue faculty, staff, students, and visitors had the chance to stop by the Purdue University Creamery on campus, where they could purchase fresh ice cream.    Read More           Books Q&A     Books Q&A Posted on Feb 06, 2017  Five questions with Henry Hughes, author of Back Seat with Fish.    Read More           Enhanced Alumni Directory     Enhanced Alumni Directory Posted on Feb 03, 2017  We've added more search features to our members-only online alumni directory. Now, in addition to looking up Boilermakers by name, class year, and major, you can also search by employer, student organization or activity, and interest. Plus, our In Memoriam database is also searchable online. Access to the alumni directory is restricted to Purdue Alumni members, so log in to start searching.      Read More           All New Member Savings Program     All New Member Savings Program Posted on Feb 02, 2017  Find exclusive discounts from popular restaurants, retailers, hotels, theme parks and more.    Read More           Brazen Online Networking Event     Brazen Online Networking Event Posted on Feb 02, 2017  Don't miss out on this incredible opportunity to connect with other Boilermakers! Join fellow alums to share your love for Purdue, get career advice, and just meet new people — all online. Come build real relationships and connections in a purposeful, exciting way. It's free, it's for only an hour and it's fun!    Read More           February Desktop Calendars     February Desktop Calendars Posted on Jan 31, 2017  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni: Kaitlin Peraino     Featured Young Alumni: Kaitlin Peraino Posted on Jan 30, 2017  As an undergraduate, Kaitlin Peraino (ChE’09) interned for three co-op terms at Marathon Petroleum securing a position with the global corporation upon graduation.  In her time with the company, she has worked on numerous process units, gaining a broad understanding of refinery processes.    Read More           Year of the Fire Rooster     Year of the Fire Rooster Posted on Jan 28, 2017  Happy new year to Boilermakers around the world who are celebrating the year of the Fire Rooster. According to the Chinese zodiac, people born under this sign are known for being trustworthy, punctual, and responsible — especially at work.    Read More           The Everyday Magic Of Moisture Absorption     The Everyday Magic Of Moisture Absorption Posted on Jan 27, 2017  Your most sophisticated lawn sprinkler system may rely on a junk-drawer staple. Because magic tape — that whisper-thin, nearly invisible wonder of modern household adhesion — holds not just daily utility but super-powers. Professor Babak Ziaie is working to unleash them.    Read More           Treat Your Sweetie     Treat Your Sweetie Posted on Jan 26, 2017  Surprise your valentine with tickets to the 10th annual Boilermaker Ball and get ready to jump, jive and wail!    Read More           Purdue Alumni Scholarship     Purdue Alumni Scholarship Posted on Jan 25, 2017  Applications for the Purdue Alumni scholarship are due March 1. Candidates must demonstrate commitment to the association's strategic initiatives: membership, relationships, and alumni as a pillar of strength for Purdue University. Preference will be given to students whose parents are graduates and members of the Purdue Alumni Association.    Read More           Ask Pete     Ask Pete Posted on Jan 24, 2017  Are the toasted cheese sandwiches and chocolate shakes at the Sweet Shop still as good as they were in the 50s?    Read More           Boilers in South China     Boilers in South China Posted on Jan 23, 2017  Members of the South China Purdue Alumni international network recently gathered to celebrate the holidays. With more than 60 established international networks, Purdue's presence can be felt around the world.    Read More           Land of Fire and Ice     Land of Fire and Ice Posted on Jan 20, 2017  Iceland is a country of massive glaciers and rumbling volcanoes, bubbling mud holes and powerful waterfalls.  A land where the sun never sets for six splendid weeks.    Read More           Happy National Popcorn Day     Happy National Popcorn Day Posted on Jan 19, 2017  Orville Redenbacher (A'28) started out selling his kernels from the back of his car. By the time he died in 1995 at age 88, he was a national celebrity, whose name was synonymous with light and fluffy popping corn. We'll gladly raise a buttery bag today in honor of the Popcorn King.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Frank Toy     Alumni Profile: Frank Toy Posted on Jan 18, 2017  Traveling across rocky seas — without family — from China to San Francisco’s Angel Island in 1926, Frank Chuck Toy (CE’39), then 12, began designing his future.  Now 101, he credits Purdue for his bachelor’s degree in civil engineering, recommendation to Pennsylvania State University, where he earned his master’s, and referrals to Boilermaker alumni who hired him — at Harrington and Berner in Indianapolis and, later, at Sprague Iron Works in Chicago.    Read More           Bright Innovations     Bright Innovations Posted on Jan 17, 2017  At Purdue, engineers, scientists, and entrepreneurs are working to make sustainable and renewable energy a larger part of our lives — here and abroad.    Read More           Farewell to a Legendary Boilermaker     Farewell to a Legendary Boilermaker Posted on Jan 16, 2017  Gene Cernan (ECE'56, HDR E'70) passed away January 16, 2017, at age 82. A three-time spacewalker, Cernan was the most recent man to walk on the lunar surface, 44 years ago. Upon leaving the moon at the end of the Apollo 17 mission, Cernan stated, "We leave as we came, and, God willing, we shall return, with peace and hope for all mankind."    Read More           Flex Your Social Media Muscle     Flex Your Social Media Muscle Posted on Jan 15, 2017  Become a Boiler Booster! Share Purdue news on social media, earn points, and win sweet Purdue swag.     Read More           Dust Furniture     Dust Furniture Posted on Jan 13, 2017  For Vincent Leman (ME’00), building whimsical furniture is his way of joining his love for art and design with his love for mechanical engineering. The creations coming from his company, Dust Furniture, look like normal bookcases sent through a funhouse mirror.    Read More           Trio Lands on Forbes List     Trio Lands on Forbes List Posted on Jan 12, 2017  Three co-founders of a Purdue University-affiliated startup have been chosen by Forbes magazine for its annual “30 Under 30” list of exceptional innovators under the age of 30. Prahasith Veluvolu, 21; Jacobi Petrucciani, 22; and Colton Voege, 21, co-founders of Mimir, were selected for the honor. The trio was chosen for the award’s 2017 Education category and honored for “being part of the new breed of AI grading and teacher-to-student feedback.” All three are former computer science students in Purdue’s College of Science. In business for about two years, Mimir specializes in cloud-based computer science coursework assistance.    Read More           Honors College     Honors College Posted on Jan 11, 2017  In September, Purdue dedicated the $90 million Honors College and Residences, the first of its kind in Indiana and among the nation’s most advanced academic residential colleges. The design for the 324,000-square-foot facility is the result of research about how high-ability students learn.    Read More           President's Message     President's Message Posted on Jan 09, 2017  An Open Letter from Purdue University President Mitch Daniels    Read More           Find a Game Watch Near You     Find a Game Watch Near You Posted on Jan 06, 2017  Purdue Alumni clubs across the country will be hosting basketball game watches throughout the season. Meet up with fellow fans to cheer on the Boilermakers.    Read More           Parental Oversight     Parental Oversight Posted on Jan 05, 2017  Growing up, Travis Dorsch played football, basketball, baseball, and soccer. And he ran track. In college, he was an All-America kicker for Purdue’s football team, setting him up to play a few years in the NFL. In adulthood, he’s taken up competing in Ironman triathlons.    Read More           Instant Replay     Instant Replay Posted on Jan 04, 2017  En route to a 10–1 nonconference record and No. 10 national ranking, the Purdue volleyball team knocked off two top-10 ranked opponents in a week — No. 9 Stanford on the road and No. 4 Kansas on Belin Court at Holloway Gymnasium.    Read More           Recipe for a Boilermaker     Recipe for a Boilermaker Posted on Jan 03, 2017  It takes more than old gold and black to make a Boilermaker.  Innovation, loyalty, pride... that's the stuff Purdue grads are made of.    Read More           50th Anniversary of the Rose Bowl     50th Anniversary of the Rose Bowl Posted on Jan 02, 2017  On this day in 1967, the Purdue Boilermakers made their first trip to the Rose Bowl in Pasadena, California. Check out the photo gallery from the Purdue Bands and Orchestras Alumni Club Rose Bowl 50th reunion held this past October.    Read More           January Desktop Calendars     January Desktop Calendars Posted on Dec 29, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Then and Now     Then and Now Posted on Dec 27, 2016  In late September, 101-year-old Esther Cox (HHS’38) visited her alma mater to see the campus and recreate this special photo. Purdue is near and dear to her. She recalls good times spent at dances, basketball games, Pappy’s, and evening seminars taught by Amelia Earhart. A Chi Omega, she studied fashion design, but went to Washington, DC, after graduation to work in security.    Read More           Time's Running Out for the Boilermaker Ball Young Alumni Discount     Time's Running Out for the Boilermaker Ball Young Alumni Discount Posted on Dec 26, 2016  Break out your finest threads, and get all shook up for the 2017 Boilermaker Ball. This groovy night will feature the sights, sounds, and tastes of Purdue in the 1950s. The deadline for the young alumni rate is December 31, so get with it and make your reservation today!    Read More           Serve and Protect     Serve and Protect Posted on Dec 22, 2016  Lieutenant Andy Standifer (LA’99) became the Purdue Police Department’s first K-9 officer in 2008 when a Dutch Shepherd named Nicky joined the force as his partner.    Read More           Student Profile     Student Profile Posted on Dec 21, 2016  30 Seconds with Nathan Muntz    Read More           Holiday Recipe Swap     Holiday Recipe Swap Posted on Dec 20, 2016  Take a look at some favorite holiday recipes submitted by Boilermakers. Plus, members can download our exclusive free printable 4x6 recipe card.    Read More           Congratulations Graduates!     Congratulations Graduates! Posted on Dec 19, 2016  Welcome December graduates to the Purdue Alumni family! As a recent grad you'll receive a complimentary one-year membership in the Purdue Alumni Association. Take advantage of our 50 percent off life membership offer through December 31 and stay connected for life.    Read More           Commencement Open House     Commencement Open House Posted on Dec 16, 2016  December and their families are invited to stop by our Commencement Open House from 9:00 a.m. to 2:00 p.m. on Sunday, December 18 in the Purdue Memorial Union West Lounge. Commemorate this occasion with a complimentary souvenir family photo. Plus, those who purchase a life membership go home with their choice of free gift, a Purdue Alumni growler or travel charger.    Read More           Gift Tag Printables     Gift Tag Printables Posted on Dec 15, 2016  Just in time for the holidays, Purdue Alumni members can download our Boilermaker-themed gift tag printables.    Read More           Maintaining Civility     Maintaining Civility Posted on Dec 15, 2016  This year’s presidential election has been a hot (and often heated) topic of conversation. Now we are processing the results, just as we head into the holidays, when social gatherings are commonplace. With that in mind, we queried several Purdue faculty members for advice on maintaining civility among friends and family after the campaign.    Read More           Crossroads Classic Fan Headquarters     Crossroads Classic Fan Headquarters Posted on Dec 13, 2016  Get ready to watch the Boilermakers take on the Notre Dame Fighting Irish in the 2016 Crossroads Classic on Saturday, December 17! Before, during, and after the game, Scotty’s Brewhouse in Downtown Indy is your Purdue Fan Headquarters.    Read More           Santa's Got a Brand New Bag     Santa's Got a Brand New Bag Posted on Dec 12, 2016  Wherever the future takes any child, the Purdue Engineering Gift Guide is hoping to steer more of them into the wide world of engineering. The guide, now in its third edition, is the brainchild of INSPIRE, the Research Institute for Pre-College Engineering.    Read More           Deck the Hall     Deck the Hall Posted on Dec 09, 2016  The tree that will brighten up the holiday season this year in Purdue Memorial Union represents a tradition that’s at least 80 years old. A Christmas tree has added to the Union’s festive air since the 1930s, says Margie Jones, program director for PMU.    Read More           Last Chance to RSVP for Commencement Brunch     Last Chance to RSVP for Commencement Brunch Posted on Dec 08, 2016  Celebrate your graduate's achievements at the official Purdue Commencement Brunch on Sunday, December 18 at the Purdue Memorial Union. The RSVP deadline is 5:00 p.m. Monday, December 12.    Read More           Boilermaker Ball Tickets Make the Perfect Gift     Boilermaker Ball Tickets Make the Perfect Gift Posted on Dec 07, 2016  Don’t be a square gift-giver this holiday. Your favorite guy or gal will flip when you give the gift of a night out at the 2017 Boilermaker Ball! Get dibs on your seats today.    Read More           Dauch Holiday Open House Photo Gallery     Dauch Holiday Open House Photo Gallery Posted on Dec 06, 2016  Old Gold and Black Boilermaker Santa was on hand to visit with children of all ages at the Dauch Holiday Open House. Take a look at the photo gallery.    Read More           Boilermaker Station     Boilermaker Station Posted on Dec 05, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has begun construction in room 108 of the Purdue Memorial Union in October. This space is across from the Visitor’s Information Center and was formerly held by the PMU director. The satellite location will open at the end of February 2017 and will be named Boilermaker Station.    Read More           Senior Send Off Photo Gallery     Senior Send Off Photo Gallery Posted on Dec 02, 2016  More than 400 seniors celebrated winter graduation with Purdue Alumni at Senior Send Off. Check out the photo gallery.    Read More           We're Thankful For Our Members     We're Thankful For Our Members Posted on Dec 01, 2016  Your Purdue Alumni membership helps us do amazing things.  Not a member?  Join today!    Read More           December Desktop Calendars     December Desktop Calendars Posted on Nov 30, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Brazen Networking     Brazen Networking Posted on Nov 29, 2016  Our next Brazen online networking event is December 6. Make meaningful connections through purposeful discussions with fellow Boilermakers. Get registered now to be part of the conversation.    Read More           Travel With Us     Travel With Us Posted on Nov 24, 2016  Plan your next vacation with Purdue Alumni. Check out our 2017 travel destinations.    Read More           Basketball Family     Basketball Family Posted on Nov 23, 2016  Former Purdue and NBA basketball player Doug Lee (HHS’87) utilizes the skills he’s learned on and off the court to coach and mentor the varsity basketball team at Calvary Chapel Christian School in Las Vegas, Nevada. Lee and his team are the focus of a new documentary, The Basketball Family, that delivers a behind-the-scenes look at the struggles and triumphs of a high school basketball season.    Read More           Purdue Alumni Award Winners     Purdue Alumni Award Winners Posted on Nov 22, 2016  Four exemplary Boilermakers were honored for their service to Purdue and its alumni during the 2016 Celebration Dinner.     Read More           Ask Pete     Ask Pete Posted on Nov 21, 2016  Who would Pete vote for as president?    Read More           Best Business Schools     Best Business Schools Posted on Nov 19, 2016  Krannert School of Business rose 11 spots to No. 42 in the recently released Bloomberg Businessweek MBA rankings for 2016. The employer survey, which measures recruiter opinions on how well MBA programs equip their graduates with relevant skills, ranked Krannert at No. 17, ahead of Stanford, UC-Berkeley, Yale, NYU, UCLA, and Indiana.    Read More           It's Demo Time!     It's Demo Time! Posted on Nov 18, 2016  Watch Purdue Pete tear down some walls in our new space at the Purdue Memorial Union.    Read More           Chemical Engineering Program Earns Top 25 Ranking     Chemical Engineering Program Earns Top 25 Ranking Posted on Nov 17, 2016  College Choice recognized Purdue's chemical engineering program as one of the best in the nation, stating: "Purdue offers a challenging, holistic, and varied educational experience. In addition to the 97 credits of required core classes, students may participate in internships, the cooperative education program, or even earn scholarships to study abroad for a semester."    Read More           Featured Young Alumni     Featured Young Alumni Posted on Nov 16, 2016  When asked about the transition from Purdue to the real world, Mariah says, “It’s your life — seize it and make it what you imagined for yourself. Set goals for yourself, personally and professionally, and go after them.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Sid McNairy     Alumni Profile: Sid McNairy Posted on Nov 15, 2016  The former Northern Illinois University coach tried the centuries-old practice of yoga in the mid-1990s as he struggled to overcome an injury. Twenty years later, he teaches at his expanding studio in Maryland, speaks to groups and teams, trains other instructors, and has recently released a second book on yoga and life empowerment.    Read More           Cliff Diving Alumni Reach New Heights     Cliff Diving Alumni Reach New Heights Posted on Nov 14, 2016  Purdue diving alumni Steven LoBue (HHS'09) and David Cloture (HHS'11) once again clinched full-time spots on next year's Red Bull Cliff Diving World Series after finishing among the top 10 competitors this season. The divers on the tour compete from platforms as high as 28 meters (91 feet) in both metropolitan and exotic locales in Asia, Europe, and North America.    Read More           Commencement Brunch     Commencement Brunch Posted on Nov 11, 2016  Make plans now to celebrate your graduate at the Purdue Alumni commencement brunch on Sunday, December 18 in the Purdue Memorial Union South Ballroom.    Read More           Able Flight     Able Flight Posted on Nov 10, 2016  Shavon McGlynn, who has severe hearing loss, admits she knew nothing about airplanes, flight, or other people who had disabilities different from hers. But a chance 2015 meeting with Purdue graduate student and Able Flight alumnus Wes Major (T’15) led her to explore the possibility of earning her sport pilot license through the Able Flight program.    Read More           Charting History     Charting History Posted on Nov 09, 2016  Max Campbell (LA’14, MA’16) spent the summer of 2015 sorting through history at the Smithsonian’s National Air and Space Museum. He liked it so much that he reapplied for the internship and went to work on the same project, along with Hannah Vaughn (LA’16), whom he had encouraged to apply for the program.    Read More           Half Priced Life     Half Priced Life Posted on Nov 08, 2016  Looking for the perfect gift for your grad? Purchase a gift membership and keep your Boilermaker connected to Purdue for many years to come. Now through December 31, get 50% off a lifetime membership in the Purdue Alumni Association and a complimentary gift.    Read More           Wild Bunch Rides Again     Wild Bunch Rides Again Posted on Nov 07, 2016  Facing graduation in December 1981, John White (T’81) made his Tarkington Hall buddies swear that they weren’t going to be like every other group of yahoos who promise to stay in touch, but never actually reunite. And so it was agreed that no matter how far away from campus they may roam, the members of The Wild Bunch (TWB) would return in five years to gather on Tark’s back dock.    Read More           NSBE Founded at Purdue in 1975     NSBE Founded at Purdue in 1975 Posted on Nov 04, 2016  Today, Tony Harris is a successful entrepreneur in California. But in 1971, he was a kid from the south side of Chicago who wanted to be an engineer, but had never taken a calculus class. His experiences at Purdue led him and five other Boilermakers ("The Chicago Six") to form the National Society of Black Engineers (NSBE), which now has more than 30,000 members in 350 chapters around the world.    Read More           Alumni Abroad     Alumni Abroad Posted on Nov 03, 2016  Mary Dennis, Purdue Alumni's vice president for international outreach and engagement, accompanied Purdue President Mitch Daniels on visits to Taipei and Hong Kong last week. With 65 international alumni networks around the globe, you can find Boilermakers anywhere on earth.    Read More           Boiler Boosters     Boiler Boosters Posted on Nov 03, 2016  Become a Boiler Booster!  Get exclusives and points by sharing news about Purdue on social media.    Read More           November Desktop Calendars     November Desktop Calendars Posted on Nov 01, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Cinnamon Catlin-Legutko     Alumni Profile: Cinnamon Catlin-Legutko Posted on Oct 28, 2016  Strategic planning may not often be described as thrilling, but for Cinnamon Catlin-Legutko (LA’94), it’s one of the best parts of her job.    Read More           Found     Found Posted on Oct 27, 2016  Renamed for Dave Pfendler (A’32) in 2004 upon its re-dedication, the building, and its vault, offers a window to the past and pays tribute to the university’s rich agricultural heritage.    Read More           Football Pregame Band Show     Football Pregame Band Show Posted on Oct 26, 2016  The Purdue “All-American” Marching Band will perform a 30-minute concert in Mackey Arena beginning one hour and 45 minutes before kickoff for each of the remaining three home football games.  The Band Spectacular is free for all fans and replaces the 211 Session.    Read More           Whatever Happened To     Whatever Happened To Posted on Oct 26, 2016  The third of four sons of Tai-Hyun Chung and Ipoon Kim, Do Sop Chung grew up in South Korea under Japanese occupation. He came to America in 1954 to pursue a degree in chemical engineering at Purdue, where he was a resident of Hall X, now known as Meredith Hall.    Read More           Mascot Camp     Mascot Camp Posted on Oct 25, 2016  We tailed six super students for one weekend at the top mascot training program in the country to discover: what does it take to be Purdue Pete?    Read More           Traditions: Victory Bell     Traditions: Victory Bell Posted on Oct 21, 2016  The Victory Bell was purchased in 1877 and suspended in the old heating plant, where it was manually rung as a summons to class and chapel as well as a general warning bell — at least on those occasions when students hadn’t muffled the clapper or turned it upside down and filled it with water to freeze on cold nights.    Read More           Boilermaker Ball     Boilermaker Ball Posted on Oct 20, 2016  Whether through an in-kind donation, sponsorship, or as a Benefactor, there are many ways that you can be a part of the Purdue Alumni Association's signature event and Purdue's most famous night.    Read More           Secure Protection     Secure Protection Posted on Oct 18, 2016  New toy cars with sirens were an exciting addition to Omer Kiyani’s (T’04) play time as a child. In fact, he was more excited about figuring out how they worked than with playing with them.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni     Featured Young Alumni Posted on Oct 14, 2016  While at Purdue, Matthew worked at the Indiana Statehouse with the Indiana House Republicans.  Today, Matthew resides in Lebanon, Indiana, where he is mayor; he was elected in November 2015 and is currently the youngest Republican mayor in Indiana.    Read More           Big Idea     Big Idea Posted on Oct 13, 2016  We live in a world of small thinking. We live in a world where tomorrow’s world leaders engage in Twitter spats, where national conversations revolve around Bachelorette plot points, and where fast-food menu changes lead to vigorous debate.  But what if we decided it was time to break free from these constraints and think much, much bigger?    Read More           Decoding Brain Signals     Decoding Brain Signals Posted on Oct 12, 2016  Researchers have taken an important step toward deciphering the brain’s neuroelectric system that could underlie sleep disorders and conditions such as Alzheimer’s, epilepsy, and schizophrenia.    Read More           1869 Tap Room     1869 Tap Room Posted on Oct 11, 2016  Celebrate Purdue gameday traditions at the 1869 Tap Room, a classic pub that will begin serving People’s Brewing Company beer at the Purdue Memorial Union.    Read More           Fellowship Surge     Fellowship Surge Posted on Oct 11, 2016  Graduate students gain global insight through prestigious scholarships.    Read More           Special Boilermaker Awards     Special Boilermaker Awards Posted on Oct 10, 2016  This award was established by the Purdue Alumni Association in 1981 to recognize and honor special people who have contributed significantly to the improvement of the quality of life and the betterment of the education experience for a substantial number of students and whose life-works have improved the public image of the university, therefore contributing to the continuing respect for the university.    Read More           Instant Replay     Instant Replay Posted on Oct 07, 2016  Boilermaker Olympians won four medals in Rio de Janeiro, including alumna Amanda Elmore (S’13) who won a gold for the US women’s eight rowing team.    Read More           Upcoming Club Events     Upcoming Club Events Posted on Oct 06, 2016  Networking events, picnics, game watch parties, and more.  Find out what's happening in your area!    Read More           Perfect Specimen     Perfect Specimen Posted on Oct 05, 2016  With more than 40,000 plants on the West Lafayette campus, being selected as one of the sexiest is quite an honor. But who is keeping track of who is hot and who is not this season? … The Purdue Arboretum.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Emily Smith     Alumni Profile: Emily Smith Posted on Oct 04, 2016  Emily Smith (HHS'10) enrolled at Purdue planning to become a kindergarten teacher. But in a big world, she found an even grander calling.    Read More           October Desktop Calendars     October Desktop Calendars Posted on Sep 30, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           No Thanks     No Thanks Posted on Sep 29, 2016  As Baby Boomers start cleaning out attics and basements, many are discovering that Millennials are not so interested in the lifestyle trappings or nostalgic memorabilia they were so lovingly raised with.    Read More           Chasing Bubbles     Chasing Bubbles Posted on Sep 29, 2016  Watch the inspiring “Chasing Bubbles” documentary about a man, his boat, and their search for meaning. Released on September 21, 2016, it stars and is partially directed by deceased Purdue alum Alex Rust (E’06) from Seymour, IN. Watch for free online.    Read More           Discovery Tuscany     Discovery Tuscany Posted on Sep 28, 2016  Visitors to Tuscany come for many reasons. Some come in search of fine art, others to explore the extraordinary countryside. Whatever your reason, the beauty of this region of Italy will remain with you long after your stay.    Read More           Purdue Among Top Public Institutions     Purdue Among Top Public Institutions Posted on Sep 28, 2016  Purdue ranks fourth among public institutions in the United States, based on a new survey announced Wednesday (Sept. 28) by the Wall Street Journal and Times Higher Education.    Read More           Bigger, Stronger, Faster     Bigger, Stronger, Faster Posted on Sep 27, 2016  A competitive nature is an inherent trait for defensive tackle Jake Replogle. He grew up in a football family in Centerville, Ohio. From youth league to college play, football season was the highlight of the year.    Read More           October Brazen Event     October Brazen Event Posted on Sep 26, 2016  Don't miss out on this incredible opportunity to connect with other Purdue alumni! The next event is October 4 from 12:00 p.m. - 1:00 p.m. ET.    Read More           30 Seconds with Emma Foster     30 Seconds with Emma Foster Posted on Sep 23, 2016  "Dance has always been a creative and emotional outlet for me, and I think that is a major reason that it is still a part of my life. "    Read More           Legacy Open House     Legacy Open House Posted on Sep 22, 2016  Your Purdue Alumni Association is celebrating families with alumni and current students in school at our Legacy Open House.    Read More           Leading With Love     Leading With Love Posted on Sep 21, 2016  It’s not only about Rachael Drye (MS NRS’14) and Finote Asfaw’s (MS NRS’14) love for each other, but also the compassion for his native Ethiopia and for the people of that eastern African country.    Read More           Books Q&A     Books Q&A Posted on Sep 20, 2016  5 questions with Sarah J. Schmitt (S'01), author of It's a Wonderful Death.    Read More           Boilermaker Ball     Boilermaker Ball Posted on Sep 19, 2016  It's the 10th anniversary and we want to rock around the clock with you!    Read More           Featured Young Alumni     Featured Young Alumni Posted on Sep 16, 2016  Anand Dalal earned his bachelor of science degree from the College of Technology Statewide in May 2011 with a degree in organizational leadership. While at Purdue, Anand interned at Sears Holdings Corporation in logistics management.    Read More           Become a Member     Become a Member Posted on Sep 15, 2016  Show your love and support for Purdue University.    Read More           Campus Overload     Campus Overload Posted on Sep 14, 2016  How to house a record number of students in residence halls.    Read More           Lasting Impact     Lasting Impact Posted on Sep 13, 2016  The Miller Child Development Lab School marks 90 years.    Read More           Networking Dinner     Networking Dinner Posted on Sep 12, 2016  Engage with alumni to build your professional network.    Read More           Dauch Open House     Dauch Open House Posted on Sep 09, 2016  The Dauch Alumni Center will be open each home game this season from 8:00 a.m. until game time.    Read More           Smart Window     Smart Window Posted on Sep 08, 2016  The Purdue Memorial Union is home to a stained glass window dedicated to a past Purdue president.     Read More           Hong Kong Network     Hong Kong Network Posted on Sep 08, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Hong Kong Network took first place among 10 teams in a joint universities alumni basketball competition, which included UCLA and UC Berkeley. Way to represent the Boilermaker nation!    Read More           President's Council 2017 Cruise Announced     President's Council 2017 Cruise Announced Posted on Sep 07, 2016  Please join us on our 2017 Rhine River cruise as we explore the most beautiful stretch of the river, famous for its forts, castles and the legendary Lorelei Rock.    Read More           PASE Mock Career Fair     PASE Mock Career Fair Posted on Sep 06, 2016  The PASE Mock Career Fair is your chance to speak with local employers and representatives from PASE, SMEF, the CCO, Purdue Writing Lab, and Krannert Undergraduate Career Services.    Read More           September Networking Event     September Networking Event Posted on Sep 02, 2016  Don't miss out on this incredible opportunity to connect with other Purdue alumni!    Read More           Traditions     Traditions Posted on Sep 01, 2016  Fountain runs are a rite of passage for many Purdue students.    Read More           Football Season Is Here!     Football Season Is Here! Posted on Sep 01, 2016  Take a look at this guide to make your 2016 Purdue Football experience an enjoyable and pleasant one.    Read More           September Desktop Calendars     September Desktop Calendars Posted on Aug 31, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Whatever Happened To     Whatever Happened To Posted on Aug 30, 2016  Born October 29, 1930, to Ken (ChE’30) and Susie Uran, Jean (Uran) Foltz followed her father’s footsteps to Purdue, where she majored in home economics education.    Read More           Legends of the Nile     Legends of the Nile Posted on Aug 29, 2016  Although you may have seen pictures of the Great Pyramid in Giza, Egypt, nothing compares to the thrill of standing in front of this wondrous monument, marveling at the engineering and construction ingenuity of the ancient Egyptians.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Jill Zeller     Alumni Profile: Jill Zeller Posted on Aug 26, 2016  Jill (Steiner) Zeller (A'09) knows that running a profitable farming operation is a lot of hard work.    Read More           Home Sweet Home     Home Sweet Home Posted on Aug 25, 2016  Gregg Mantock (S’87) was a tall, burly, analytical freshman majoring in computer science and math when he walked into Elliott Hall of Music in 1982 to audition for Purdue Musical Organizations (PMO).    Read More           Featured Young Alumni: Kindra Rodgers     Featured Young Alumni: Kindra Rodgers Posted on Aug 24, 2016  Kindra resides in Lafayette, Indiana, where she is currently working at Purdue in the Center for Career Opportunities (CCO). Her main role is employer coordinator, in which she helps recruit viable Purdue candidates.    Read More           Kilimanjaro, Tanzania     Kilimanjaro, Tanzania Posted on Aug 23, 2016  A week after Abigail Ekeigwe’s (MS T’16) friend Nkechi gave birth by caesarean section last November, she was not healing, and she was experiencing severe pain and high fevers.    Read More           Books Q&A     Books Q&A Posted on Aug 19, 2016  5 questions with Kristen Ashley (LA '90), author of Bounty.    Read More           Speaking Out     Speaking Out Posted on Aug 18, 2016  Even on the seemingly quiet and conservative Purdue campus, students — and faculty — are not afraid to put their beliefs into action.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Kevin Martin     Alumni Profile: Kevin Martin Posted on Aug 17, 2016  Everything is better told as if you’re writing a story — even office memos,” laughs Kevin Martin (M’84), recalling a Harvard Business Review article he read early in his career.    Read More           Purdue in Panama     Purdue in Panama Posted on Aug 16, 2016  Purdue Alumni and friends had a fun get-together in Panama with Mary Dennis from Purdue Alumni and Cheryl Altinkemer from Purdue University.    Read More           Testing Matters     Testing Matters Posted on Aug 16, 2016  Why using SAT and ACT scores for admissions still makes sense.    Read More           Grand Prix Champions     Grand Prix Champions Posted on Aug 15, 2016  Nine previous Grand Prix Champions were in attendance at the 2016 Grand Prix.   Read More           Indiana State Fair - August 5     Indiana State Fair - August 5 Posted on Aug 14, 2016  The Purdue Alumni table will be located in the Purdue Ag/Hort Building from 10:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m.  Purdue Alumni members are encouraged to stop by for a free milkshake coupon.    Read More           30 Seconds with Nilofer Rajpurkar     30 Seconds with Nilofer Rajpurkar Posted on Aug 12, 2016  A junior in the College of Biomedical Engineering, Rajpurkar is chair of the 2016 Boiler Gold Rush student Orientation Committee.    Read More           Ask Pete     Ask Pete Posted on Aug 11, 2016  Q. My daughter will be a freshman this fall and we’ll be moving her into the residence halls. I think she is drastically overestimating the size of her dorm room. How can I convince her that she doesn’t really need all that stuff?    Read More           Game, Set, Match     Game, Set, Match Posted on Aug 10, 2016  Redshirt sophomore earns unanimous first-team All-Big Ten selection honors    Read More           Instant Replay     Instant Replay Posted on Aug 09, 2016  August Kim is out to make a name for herself. As the 2016 Big Ten Champion, the junior biochemistry major is making sure her name is prominent in the Purdue record books on the course and in the classroom.    Read More           Strike Up the Band     Strike Up the Band Posted on Aug 08, 2016  In the spring of 1954 Purdue University was searching for a new director of bands to replace Paul “Spotts” Emrick who was retiring after 49 years. No one on the campus without a school of music felt qualified to make the decision.    Read More           Boilers in Peru     Boilers in Peru Posted on Aug 05, 2016  Purdue alumni and friends had a great time at a recent event in Lima, Peru, with staff from the Purdue Alumni Association and Purdue University.    Read More           View From the Lab     View From the Lab Posted on Aug 05, 2016  The Vilas Pol Energy Research (ViPER) Laboratory focuses on rechargeable energy storage technology and has had success creating battery components from such everyday things as pollen, packing peanuts, and mushrooms.    Read More           Summer Downloads     Summer Downloads Posted on Aug 04, 2016  Boilers give their recommendations for books, shows, and music.    Read More           Fast and Furious     Fast and Furious Posted on Aug 03, 2016  A new highly efficient power amplifier for electronics could help make possible next-generation cell phones, low-cost collision-avoidance radar for cars, and lightweight microsatellites for communications.    Read More           Tail-Wagging Roadtrips     Tail-Wagging Roadtrips Posted on Aug 02, 2016  If you’re planning to take your pet along on a family vacation this summer, there are several steps you should take to get your cat or dog ready to travel.    Read More           Buy Your Student a PASE Membership     Buy Your Student a PASE Membership Posted on Aug 01, 2016  Know a student who is graduating this year? Tell them to check out the Senior Year Experience through the Purdue Alumni Association. There are social and networking events all year long, as well as opportunities to win prizes. It’s all about celebrating Purdue seniors! Visit www.purduealumni.org/senioryear to learn more.    Read More           August Desktop Calendars     August Desktop Calendars Posted on Jul 29, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Boilermaker Bash     Boilermaker Bash Posted on Jul 28, 2016  Purdue Alumni is excited to host a Boilermaker Bash at College Park, Maryland, prior to the Boilermakers taking on the Terrapins!    Read More           Alumni Profile: Nancy Louis     Alumni Profile: Nancy Louis Posted on Jul 27, 2016  If you're going to work a retirement job, running a bed and breakfast in the U.S. Virgin Islands might be tough to beat.    Read More           August Brazen Event     August Brazen Event Posted on Jul 26, 2016  Don't miss out on this incredible opportunity to connect with other Purdue alumni!    Read More           Homecoming     Homecoming Posted on Jul 25, 2016  Save the date: October 15    Read More           Purdue Day of Giving     Purdue Day of Giving Posted on Jul 22, 2016  Bigger & Better campaign raises a record $18.3 million in 24-hours.    Read More           Purdue Student Picnics     Purdue Student Picnics Posted on Jul 21, 2016  Join your local Purdue Alumni club for a send-off picnic for incoming Purdue freshmen from your area.    Read More           High Honors     High Honors Posted on Jul 20, 2016  Nancy Ho, founder and president of Green Tech America Inc. and a research professor emerita in Purdue’s School of Chemical Engineering, received the National Medal of Technology and Innovation from President Barack Obama during a White House ceremony on May 19.    Read More           Top-Notch Talent     Top-Notch Talent Posted on Jul 19, 2016  Why is Jeff Bezos’s space company hiring all the Purdue grads it can find?    Read More           Grand Legacy Scholarship Winner     Grand Legacy Scholarship Winner Posted on Jul 14, 2016  Syrus Fletcher's essay was chosen as the winner of the Grand Legacy Scholarship. Congratulations, Syrus!    Read More           Grand Legacy Runner-Up Essay     Grand Legacy Runner-Up Essay Posted on Jul 08, 2016  Whitney Stedman's essay was selected as runner-up for the Grand Legacy Scholarship.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni     Featured Young Alumni Posted on Jul 05, 2016  Jared Travers earned his bachelor of science degree from the College of Science in May 2011 with a degree in chemistry and biochemistry and minored in biological sciences. While at Purdue, Jared worked as an undergraduate research student in the Department of Medicinal Chemistry and Molecular Pharmacology (MCMP).    Read More           Alumni Trustee John Hardin     Alumni Trustee John Hardin Posted on Jul 04, 2016  After 24 years of service, John Hardin Jr. (A'67) will retire from the Purdue University Board of Trustees on June 30, 2016.    Read More           Order Your Purdue Alumni Calendars     Order Your Purdue Alumni Calendars Posted on Jul 01, 2016  Your Purdue Alumni Association is offering pocket and wall calendars to our loyal members. To reserve your calendar today, call (877) 782-5866 or e-mail us at pocketcalendar@purdue.edu by August 31, 2016. Be sure to mention if you would like the pocket calendar, wall calendar, or both.    Read More           July Desktop Calendars     July Desktop Calendars Posted on Jun 30, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers. Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Thank You For Your Service     Thank You For Your Service Posted on Jun 29, 2016  Thank you to the following individuals as they leave the Purdue Alumni Association Board of Directors: From left, Roger Hadley (A’75), Paul Branham (NE’12), Cheryl Cunningham (CE’80), Jon Schmaltz (S’96), Kristen Quinlan (S’96), Paul Fratiello (ME’88), and Kevin Metrocavage (AAE’96). Your service is greatly appreciated.    Read More           Brazen Event - July 5     Brazen Event - July 5 Posted on Jun 28, 2016  Get started now and join fellow alums to share your love for Purdue, get career advice, and just meet new people — all online! Purdue Alumni will host a Brazen event on Tuesday, July 5 - 12:00-1:00 p.m. ET. Alumni can connect with fellow Boilermakers that graduated from the same college or school. Get registered to be a part of the conversation.    Read More           Ask Pete     Ask Pete Posted on Jun 27, 2016  Purdue Pete answers your questions about fashion, summer activities, and moving out of your mom's basement.    Read More           Welcome Boilermakers     Welcome Boilermakers Posted on Jun 24, 2016  Join PASE during STAR! Members receive a Columbia fleece jacket, an annual membership kit with a T-shirt and pint glass, an annual membership card for discounts at local restaurants and stores, invites to networking events with alumni, information about scholarships, and much more!    Read More           Alumni Profile: Jeff Hamilton     Alumni Profile: Jeff Hamilton Posted on Jun 23, 2016  Running a microbrewery in Milwaukee, a city purportedly made famous by beers produced at larger breweries, might sound daunting. Jeff Hamilton (T’79), president of Sprecher Brewing Company, however, believes the niche market of catering to diverse tastes is vital to the company’s success.    Read More           Purdue Alumnus Wins Award     Purdue Alumnus Wins Award Posted on Jun 22, 2016  Purdue Alumni is proud to announce that the Purdue Alumnus won a Silver in CASE’s Circle of Excellence competition for the 2015 redesign. The Purdue Alumnus is the quarterly magazine of the Purdue Alumni Association and is a benefit of membership. Not a member, want the mag? Join today.    Read More           PBAO Atlanta Mixer     PBAO Atlanta Mixer Posted on Jun 21, 2016  The Purdue Black Alumni Organization (PBAO) recently hosted a mixer in Atlanta. Alumni enjoyed a meet-and-greet with Purdue Alumni’s new President and CEO Ralph Amos. Pictured from left are PBAO Board Member Lawrence Richardson (M’80), PBAO President Camille McKinley (ECE’91), and Ralph Amos.    Read More           Books Q&A     Books Q&A Posted on Jun 21, 2016  5 questions with Johnny Smith (PhD LA’11), co-author of Blood Brothers: The Fatal Friendship Between Muhammad Ali and Malcolm X   Read More           Alumni Profile: Elizabeth Carter     Alumni Profile: Elizabeth Carter Posted on Jun 20, 2016  When Elizabeth Carter (HHS’12) landed her job at Riley Hospital for Children at IU Health in Indianapolis, she didn’t just fulfill her dream, she actually was returning to where her life began. As a quadruplet born at 30 weeks, she started life in the Riley Neonatal Intensive Care Unit.    Read More           Boilers In Tuscany     Boilers In Tuscany Posted on Jun 17, 2016  Here's a group of Boilermakers on a recent Purdue Alumni trip to the Tuscan countryside. Holding the flag L to R are: Gary Wininger, Catherine Vonnegut, Shirley Sappenfield, and Nanette and Steve Weiss; Back row: Dave Sappenfield, Chris and Mary Adams, and Jay and Kit Beard.    Read More           Costa Rica's Natural Heritage     Costa Rica's Natural Heritage Posted on Jun 16, 2016  This small group tour features Purdue Professor of Entomology Tom Turpin, who will impart his unique and entertaining insights about the bio-diversity found in Costa Rica. Dr. Turpin is the driving force behind Purdue's annual Bug Bowl and a perennial favorite professor among students.    Read More           Alumni Profile: Michael Stoppelman     Alumni Profile: Michael Stoppelman Posted on Jun 15, 2016  Timing can be everything. Especially in the high-speed world of technological startups. Working at Google before it got gigantic, then in on the ground floor at Yelp, Michael Stoppelman (S’03) has been in the right place at some very opportune times.    Read More           Walking in Water     Walking in Water Posted on Jun 14, 2016  Jessica Bowditch, a veterinary neurology and physical rehabilitation technician, works with Charley, a Labrador retriever, in the underwater dog treadmill at the Small Animal Hospital.    Read More           Homecoming     Homecoming Posted on Jun 12, 2016  Don’t miss out on the Purdue Alumni schedule of events for Homecoming weekend, October 14–16. Members of the Class of 1966 are invited to share their life story online and connect with fellow classmates. Pick up your 50 year class forever medallion at Homecoming Headquarters in Purdue Memorial Union, join us at Pappy’s for a 50 year class ice cream social, and wrap up the weekend with a Class of 1966 Breakfast.    Read More           Phoenix Rising     Phoenix Rising Posted on Jun 10, 2016  The sun is setting on the lawn next to Pao Hall. Spectators surround a burning, house-like sculpture created as its own kiln — the last Fire Sculpture designed by the late, world-renowned ceramic artist Nina Hole.    Read More           Whatever Happened To     Whatever Happened To Posted on Jun 09, 2016  Lieutenant General James Record started life as a farm boy, born in Clinton County, Indiana, on September 6, 1938, the son of Edwin and Enid Record.    Read More           Aviation Memorial     Aviation Memorial Posted on Jun 08, 2016  It’s been nearly 20 years since two aviation technology students and their instructor — all experienced pilots — died in a plane crash at the Purdue Airport, but Tom Carney (T’71, MS A’77, PhD S’84) recalls the morning of September 12, 1997, vividly.    Read More           Featured Young Alumni     Featured Young Alumni Posted on Jun 07, 2016  Livia Schiavinato Eberlin earned her PhD from the College of Science in July 2012. She majored in analytical chemistry. Today, Livia resides in Austin, Texas, where she is an assistant professor in the chemistry department at the University of Texas at Austin.    Read More           Perfect Prescription     Perfect Prescription Posted on Jun 06, 2016  Members of the Purdue chapter of the National Electrical Contractors Association (NECA) put their brains and ideas to work and decided a photovoltaic panel system might be the prescription for dependable power.    Read More           Student Profile     Student Profile Posted on Jun 03, 2016  A musician (piano and trombone) and award-winning composer, Puckett premiered her first composition with the Purdue Jazz Band.    Read More           A Tip of the (Hard) Hat     A Tip of the (Hard) Hat Posted on Jun 02, 2016  Purdue Pete flipped his lid. Literally.    Read More           June Desktop Calendars     June Desktop Calendars Posted on Jun 01, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association has created a monthly series of Purdue-themed desktop wallpapers.  Show your pride and download these attractive images to display on your own computer.    Read More           Alumni Travel     Alumni Travel Posted on May 31, 2016  With exotic beauty and enchanting culture, Tahiti and her sister islands have beckoned visitors since Captain James Cook landed there in 1769.    Read More           Pomp & Circumstance     Pomp & Circumstance Posted on May 30, 2016  Objects, customs, and traditions that make Purdue's commencement ceremony special    Read More           New PASE Membership Kit Design     New PASE Membership Kit Design Posted on May 27, 2016  This year's featured icon is the Neil Armstrong statue.    Read More           Cruise with Us in 2017     Cruise with Us in 2017 Posted on May 26, 2016  Travel with fellow Boilermakers to Australia, Central America, Cuba, and more.    Read More           Get to Know President and CEO Ralph Amos     Get to Know President and CEO Ralph Amos Posted on May 25, 2016  Ralph Amos is a recognized alumni relations executive with 26 years of experience in institutional advancement and alumni engagement.    Read More           Decoding Mental Illness     Decoding Mental Illness Posted on May 25, 2016  Dan Foti, an assistant professor in the psychological sciences department at Purdue, is working to crack the code.    Read More           Campus Main Street     Campus Main Street Posted on May 24, 2016  The State Street Redevelopment Project is set to reinvent a historic campus route.    Read More           Senior Week Photo Gallery     Senior Week Photo Gallery Posted on May 20, 2016  Download and share your pictures from your last week on campus!    Read More           Register Now     Register Now Posted on May 19, 2016  You can set up your alumni profile and set your e-mail preference.    Read More           Half-price Life Membership for New Purdue Grads     Half-price Life Membership for New Purdue Grads Posted on May 18, 2016  Reward your new graduate with a life membership in the Purdue Alumni Association for $500 by visiting purduealumni.org/grad. That is 50% off the regular price! A membership in the Purdue Alumni Association comes with networking opportunities worldwide, discounts at national retailers, this magazine, invitations to special events and alumni club activities, and much more! This deal ends May 31, 2016.    Read More           Campus Myths     Campus Myths Posted on May 17, 2016  Almost from the moment of its founding, Purdue University was home to tales so strange that they seemed to be the stuff of legend, not real life. Was founder John Purdue really so particular about the appearance of campus that he insisted that no building be taller than University Hall?    Read More           Awards Nomination Deadlines Approaching     Awards Nomination Deadlines Approaching Posted on May 16, 2016  Nominations for the Special Boilermaker and Young Alumni awards are due June 1. Established in 1981, the Special Boilermaker Award honors a member of the Purdue faculty or staff who has contributed significantly to improving the quality of life and/or bettering the educational experience for a substantial number of Purdue students.    Read More           Minimizing the Bedbug's Bite     Minimizing the Bedbug's Bite Posted on May 14, 2016  Just when you thought it was safe to sleep again, bedbugs are back on the rise — a revolution sparked by their own evolution and a resistance to insecticides. The nighttime human bloodsuckers, while not carrying disease, certainly inflict psychological damage on any accommodating host. Their expanding numbers, according to a pair of Purdue entomologists, could even signal a national crisis.    Read More           Remembered     Remembered Posted on May 12, 2016  Srinivas Aravamudan (MA LA’86), professor of English and former dean of the humanities at Duke, died on April 13, 2016. Aravamudan, a scholar of 18th-century British and French literature and postcolonial literature, was also a champion of the humanities, committed to nurturing and promoting their role in contemporary society.    Read More           Cheer on Boilermaker Baseball     Cheer on Boilermaker Baseball Posted on May 12, 2016  Purdue fans in Kokomo should come to Municipal Stadium on Tuesday, May 17, to see your Purdue Boilermaker baseball team play the IPFW Mastodons. This is Purdue night at Municipal Stadium so wear all your Old Gold and Black!  The game starts at 6:30 p.m., but come early and stop by the Purdue Alumni Association table to pick up your Purdue spirit items so you can cheer on the Boilers in style. The first 300 fans get a rally towel.    Read More           Traditions     Traditions Posted on May 09, 2016  In the early 1900s, to coincide with the end of classes each May, Purdue’s student body staged a day of elaborate events that included the Purdue Circus and May Day activities.    Read More           Join Boilermakers for a round of golf this summer     Join Boilermakers for a round of golf this summer Posted on May 07, 2016  Purdue Alumni clubs around the country will be hosting many events this summer, including golf outings and student picnics. Check out the complete list of dates and locations.   Read More           Order your Purdue Alumni calendars     Order your Purdue Alumni calendars Posted on May 06, 2016  Your Purdue Alumni Association is offering pocket and wall calendars to our loyal members. To reserve your calendar today, call (877) 782-5866 or e-mail us at pocketcalendar@purdue.edu by August 31, 2016. Be sure to mention if you would like the pocket calendar, wall calendar, or both.    Read More           Commencement brunch     Commencement brunch Posted on May 05, 2016  The Purdue Alumni Association and the Purdue Memorial Union invite you to join us in celebrating the 2016 Purdue May graduates with a memorable gourmet brunch. Celebrate this special occasion with the entire family at Purdue’s official commencement brunch on Saturday, May 14, in the East and West Faculty Lounges and on Sunday, May 15, in the North and South Ballrooms in the Purdue Memorial Union. Click here to register online.   Read More     
View Older Stories & Features
   











    Brazen Networking    Member Benefits Brazen Networking  Join fellow alums to share your love for Purdue, get career advice, and just meet new people - all online! Come build real relationships and connections in a purposeful, exciting way with Brazen.   Read More    













            Loading...
            




























